Washington statutes.
RCW 43.62.060

Federal decennial census—Rights and responsibilities.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to affirm that every Washingtonian has the right and obligation to participate in the federal decennial census freely and without fear of fraud, intimidation, or harm, and to inform the public of these rights.

(2) The legislature affirms the rights of Washingtonians to all of the following, to be known as the Washington census bill of rights and responsibilities:

(a) To participate in the federal decennial census free of threat or intimidation;

(b) To the confidentiality of the information provided in the census form, as provided by federal law;

(c) To respond to the census by means made available to the respondent, either by phone, by mail, online, or in person;

(d) To request language assistance in accordance with federal law; and

(e) To verify the identity of a census worker.

(3) The secretary of state shall translate the Washington census bill of rights and responsibilities into languages other than English, consistent with the federal voting rights act of 1965, 52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503.

(4) The office of financial management shall make the Washington census bill of rights and responsibilities available on its internet website and available for inclusion on city and county census internet websites and census questionnaire assistance center internet websites.

[ 2020 c 34 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 34: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 18, 2020]." [ 2020 c 34 s 4.]